South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Blue catfish over thirty-two inches limit SECTION 1.    Section 50-13-640(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) It is unlawful to possess more than twenty-five blue catfish (Ictalurus furcatus) a day in Lake Marion, Lake Moultrie, the section of the Pee Dee River from the state border with North Carolina to the Highway 301 bridge, and the upper reach of the Santee River, and it is unlawful to possess more than one hundred fifty blue catfish a day in all other state waterways. Blue catfish limit SECTION 2.    Section 50-13-640(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful to possess more than two blue catfish (Ictalurus furcatus) greater than thirty-two inches in length in any one day in Lake Marion, Lake Moultrie, the upper reach of the Santee River, the section of the Pee Dee River from the state border with North Carolina to the Highway 301 bridge, and the Congaree and Wateree rivers. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________